Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.020

Practice without license unlawful.

(1) No one may hold themselves out to the public as an acupuncturist, licensed acupuncturist, acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, or any derivative thereof which is intended to or is likely to lead the public to believe such a person is an acupuncturist, licensed acupuncturist[,] or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, unless licensed as provided for in this chapter.

(2) A person may not practice acupuncture or Eastern medicine if the person is not licensed under this chapter.

(3) No one may use any configuration of letters after their name (including L.Ac., EAMP, or AEMP) which indicates a degree or formal training in acupuncture or Eastern medicine unless licensed as provided for in this chapter.

(4) The secretary may by rule proscribe or regulate advertising and other forms of patient solicitation which are likely to mislead or deceive the public as to whether someone is licensed under this chapter.

(5) A person licensed under this chapter may use the title acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner and may use the letters AEMP indicating such license. However, nothing in this section prohibits or limits in any way a practitioner licensed under this chapter from alternatively holding himself or herself out as an acupuncturist, licensed acupuncturist, or East Asian medicine practitioner or from using the letters L.Ac. or EAMP after his or her name.

[ 2019 c 308 s 3; 2010 c 286 s 3; 1995 c 323 s 5; 1991 c 3 s 5; 1985 c 326 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.